District of Columbia statutes.
38-404

Restriction on lot 14 in square 263.

The lot of land marked upon the plan of the City of Washington as lot No. 14, in square No. 263, which was conveyed to said City by the Commissioner of Public Buildings, under authority of an Act of Congress dated June 5, 1860, for the use of the public schools in said City, shall not be sold, assigned or conveyed or diverted, for any other purpose except as provided in § 38-405.

R.S., D.C., § 317
1981 Ed., § 31-204.
1973 Ed., § 31-805.